Illinois, session 104th, SB219.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 203 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/203)7    Sec. 203. Base income defined. 8    (a) Individuals.9        (1) In general. In the case of an individual, base 10    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's adjusted 11    gross income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph 12    (2).13        (2) Modifications. The adjusted gross income referred 14    to in paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto 15    the sum of the following amounts:16            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 17        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 18        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 19        in the computation of adjusted gross income, except 20        stock dividends of qualified public utilities 21        described in Section 305(e) of the Internal Revenue 22        Code;23            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by   SB0219- 2 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 2        the computation of adjusted gross income for the 3        taxable year;4            (C) An amount equal to the amount received during 5        the taxable year as a recovery or refund of real 6        property taxes paid with respect to the taxpayer's 7        principal residence under the Revenue Act of 1939 and 8        for which a deduction was previously taken under 9        subparagraph (L) of this paragraph (2) prior to July 10        1, 1991, the retrospective application date of Article 11        4 of Public Act 87-17. In the case of multi-unit or 12        multi-use structures and farm dwellings, the taxes on 13        the taxpayer's principal residence shall be that 14        portion of the total taxes for the entire property 15        which is attributable to such principal residence;16            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 17        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 18        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 19        computation of adjusted gross income;20            (D-5) An amount, to the extent not included in 21        adjusted gross income, equal to the amount of money 22        withdrawn by the taxpayer in the taxable year from a 23        medical care savings account and the interest earned 24        on the account in the taxable year of a withdrawal 25        pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 20 of the 26        Medical Care Savings Account Act or subsection (b) of   SB0219- 3 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        Section 20 of the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2        2000;3            (D-10) For taxable years ending after December 31, 4        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 5        costs that the individual deducted in computing 6        adjusted gross income and for which the individual 7        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;8            (D-15) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 9        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 10        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 11        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 12        the Internal Revenue Code;13            (D-16) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 14        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 15        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 16        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 17        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 18        deductions taken in all taxable years under 19        subparagraph (Z) with respect to that property.20            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 21        the last day of the last tax year for which a 22        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 23        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 24        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 25        modification under subparagraph (Z), then an amount 26        equal to that subtraction modification.   SB0219- 4 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 2        modification under this subparagraph only once with 3        respect to any one piece of property;4            (D-17) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 5        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 6        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 7        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 9        member of the same unitary business group but for the 10        fact that foreign person's business activity outside 11        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 12        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 13        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 14        who would be a member of the same unitary business 15        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 16        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 17        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 18        required to apportion business income under different 19        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 20        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 21        extent that dividends were included in base income of 22        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 23        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 24        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 25        included in gross income under Sections 951 through 26        964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts included   SB0219- 5 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        in gross income under Section 78 of the Internal 2        Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of the same 3        person to whom the interest was paid, accrued, or 4        incurred.5            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 6                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 7            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 8            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 9            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 10            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 11            with respect to such interest; or12                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 13            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 14            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 15            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 16            following:17                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 18                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 19                to a person that is not a related member, and20                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 21                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 22                person did not have as a principal purpose the 23                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 24                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 25                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 26                terms; or   SB0219- 6 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 2            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 3            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 4            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 5            and terms and the principal purpose for the 6            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 7            or 8                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 9            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 10            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 11            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 12            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 13            to the application or use of an alternative method 14            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 15                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 16            Director from making any other adjustment 17            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 18            for any tax year beginning after the effective 19            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 20            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 21            Department and such regulations provide methods 22            and standards by which the Department will utilize 23            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 24            (D-18) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 25        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 26        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or   SB0219- 7 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 2        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 3        foreign person who would be a member of the same 4        unitary business group but for the fact that the 5        foreign person's business activity outside the United 6        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 7        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 9        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 10        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 11        from being included in the unitary business group 12        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 13        business income under different subsections of Section 14        304. The addition modification required by this 15        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 16        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 17        group for the same taxable year and received by the 18        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 19        business group (including amounts included in gross 20        income under Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal 21        Revenue Code and amounts included in gross income 22        under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) with 23        respect to the stock of the same person to whom the 24        intangible expenses and costs were directly or 25        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 26        sentence does not apply to the extent that the same   SB0219- 8 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 2        modification required under Section 203(a)(2)(D-17) of 3        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 4        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 5        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 6        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 7        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 8        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 9        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 10        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 11        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 12        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 13        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 14        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 15        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 16        similar types of intangible assets.17            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:18                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 19            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 20            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 21            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 22            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 23            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 24            with respect to such item; or25                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 26            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or   SB0219- 9 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 2            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 3            following:4                    (a) the person during the same taxable 5                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 6                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 7                not a related member, and8                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 9                intangible expense or cost between the 10                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 11                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 12                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 13                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 14                or15                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 16            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 17            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 18            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 19            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 20            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 21            writing to the application or use of an 22            alternative method of apportionment under Section 23            304(f); 24                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 25            Director from making any other adjustment 26            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act   SB0219- 10 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1            for any tax year beginning after the effective 2            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 3            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 4            Department and such regulations provide methods 5            and standards by which the Department will utilize 6            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 7            (D-19) For taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 9        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 10        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 11        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 12        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 13        business group but for the fact that the person is 14        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 15        included in the unitary business group because he or 16        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 17        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 18        addition modification required by this subparagraph 19        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 20        included in base income of the unitary group for the 21        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 22        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 23        (including amounts included in gross income under 24        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 25        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 26        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the   SB0219- 11 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 2        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 3        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 4        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 5        the addition modification required under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-17) or Section 203(a)(2)(D-18) of this 7        Act; 8            (D-20) For taxable years beginning on or after 9        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 10        2006, in the case of a distribution from a qualified 11        tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal 12        Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution from a 13        College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 of the 14        State Treasurer Act or (ii) a distribution from the 15        Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, an amount equal 16        to the amount excluded from gross income under Section 17        529(c)(3)(B). For taxable years beginning on or after 18        January 1, 2007, in the case of a distribution from a 19        qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 20        Internal Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution 21        from a College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 22        of the State Treasurer Act, (ii) a distribution from 23        the Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, or (iii) a 24        distribution from a qualified tuition program under 25        Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code that (I) 26        adopts and determines that its offering materials   SB0219- 12 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        comply with the College Savings Plans Network's 2        disclosure principles and (II) has made reasonable 3        efforts to inform in-state residents of the existence 4        of in-state qualified tuition programs by informing 5        Illinois residents directly and, where applicable, to 6        inform financial intermediaries distributing the 7        program to inform in-state residents of the existence 8        of in-state qualified tuition programs at least 9        annually, an amount equal to the amount excluded from 10        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(B).11            For the purposes of this subparagraph (D-20), a 12        qualified tuition program has made reasonable efforts 13        if it makes disclosures (which may use the term 14        "in-state program" or "in-state plan" and need not 15        specifically refer to Illinois or its qualified 16        programs by name) (i) directly to prospective 17        participants in its offering materials or makes a 18        public disclosure, such as a website posting; and (ii) 19        where applicable, to intermediaries selling the 20        out-of-state program in the same manner that the 21        out-of-state program distributes its offering 22        materials;23            (D-20.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2018, in the case of a distribution from a 25        qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 26        Internal Revenue Code, other than a distribution from   SB0219- 13 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        a qualified ABLE program created under Section 16.6 of 2        the State Treasurer Act, an amount equal to the amount 3        excluded from gross income under Section 529A(c)(1)(B) 4        of the Internal Revenue Code; 5            (D-21) For taxable years beginning on or after 6        January 1, 2007, in the case of transfer of moneys from 7        a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by the 9        State to an out-of-state program, an amount equal to 10        the amount of moneys previously deducted from base 11        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section;12            (D-21.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 13        January 1, 2018, in the case of the transfer of moneys 14        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 or 15        a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 16        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by this 17        State to an ABLE account established under an 18        out-of-state ABLE account program, an amount equal to 19        the contribution component of the transferred amount 20        that was previously deducted from base income under 21        subsection (a)(2)(Y) or subsection (a)(2)(HH) of this 22        Section; 23            (D-22) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2009, and prior to January 1, 2018, in the 25        case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund of moneys 26        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of   SB0219- 14 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 2        that is not used for qualified expenses at an eligible 3        education institution, an amount equal to the 4        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 5        or refund that was previously deducted from base 6        income under subsection (a)(2)(y) of this Section, 7        provided that the withdrawal or refund did not result 8        from the beneficiary's death or disability. For 9        taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018: 10        (1) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or 11        refund, as defined under Section 16.5 of the State 12        Treasurer Act, of moneys from a qualified tuition 13        program under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code 14        administered by the State, an amount equal to the 15        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 16        or refund that was previously deducted from base 17        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section, and 18        (2) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund 19        from a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of 20        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 21        that is not used for qualified disability expenses, an 22        amount equal to the contribution component of the 23        nonqualified withdrawal or refund that was previously 24        deducted from base income under subsection (a)(2)(HH) 25        of this Section;26            (D-23) An amount equal to the credit allowable to   SB0219- 15 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 2        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 3        Act;4            (D-24) For taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 6        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 7        for the taxable year; 8            (D-25) In the case of a resident, an amount equal 9        to the amount of tax for which a credit is allowed 10        pursuant to Section 201(p)(7) of this Act; 11    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 12    following amounts:13            (E) For taxable years ending before December 31, 14        2001, any amount included in such total in respect of 15        any compensation (including but not limited to any 16        compensation paid or accrued to a serviceman while a 17        prisoner of war or missing in action) paid to a 18        resident by reason of being on active duty in the Armed 19        Forces of the United States and in respect of any 20        compensation paid or accrued to a resident who as a 21        governmental employee was a prisoner of war or missing 22        in action, and in respect of any compensation paid to a 23        resident in 1971 or thereafter for annual training 24        performed pursuant to Sections 502 and 503, Title 32, 25        United States Code as a member of the Illinois 26        National Guard or, beginning with taxable years ending   SB0219- 16 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        on or after December 31, 2007, the National Guard of 2        any other state. For taxable years ending on or after 3        December 31, 2001, any amount included in such total 4        in respect of any compensation (including but not 5        limited to any compensation paid or accrued to a 6        serviceman while a prisoner of war or missing in 7        action) paid to a resident by reason of being a member 8        of any component of the Armed Forces of the United 9        States and in respect of any compensation paid or 10        accrued to a resident who as a governmental employee 11        was a prisoner of war or missing in action, and in 12        respect of any compensation paid to a resident in 2001 13        or thereafter by reason of being a member of the 14        Illinois National Guard or, beginning with taxable 15        years ending on or after December 31, 2007, the 16        National Guard of any other state. The provisions of 17        this subparagraph (E) are exempt from the provisions 18        of Section 250;19            (F) An amount equal to all amounts included in 20        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 21        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a), and 22        408 of the Internal Revenue Code, or included in such 23        total as distributions under the provisions of any 24        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 25        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 26        retired partners, which payments are excluded in   SB0219- 17 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 2        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 3        adopted pursuant thereto;4            (G) The valuation limitation amount;5            (H) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 6        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 7        and included in such total for the taxable year;8            (I) An amount equal to all amounts included in 9        such total pursuant to the provisions of Section 111 10        of the Internal Revenue Code as a recovery of items 11        previously deducted from adjusted gross income in the 12        computation of taxable income;13            (J) An amount equal to those dividends included in 14        such total which were paid by a corporation which 15        conducts business operations in a River Edge 16        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 17        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act, and conducts 18        substantially all of its operations in a River Edge 19        Redevelopment Zone or zones. This subparagraph (J) is 20        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;21            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 22        such total that were paid by a corporation that 23        conducts business operations in a federally designated 24        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 25        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 26        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in   SB0219- 18 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 2        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 3        this subparagraph (K);4            (L) For taxable years ending after December 31, 5        1983, an amount equal to all social security benefits 6        and railroad retirement benefits included in such 7        total pursuant to Sections 72(r) and 86 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code;9            (M) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 10        under subparagraph (N), an amount equal to the sum of 11        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 12        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 13        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 14        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 15        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 16        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 17        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 18        Internal Revenue Code, plus, for taxable years ending 19        on or after December 31, 2011, Section 45G(e)(3) of 20        the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 21        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 22        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 23        Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 24        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 25        250;26            (N) An amount equal to all amounts included in   SB0219- 19 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 2        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 3        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 4        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 5        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 6        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 7        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 8        net of bond premium amortization;9            (O) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 10        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 11        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;12            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 13        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 14        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 15        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 16        the Internal Revenue Code or of any itemized deduction 17        taken from adjusted gross income in the computation of 18        taxable income for restoration of substantial amounts 19        held under claim of right for the taxable year;20            (Q) An amount equal to any amounts included in 21        such total, received by the taxpayer as an 22        acceleration in the payment of life, endowment or 23        annuity benefits in advance of the time they would 24        otherwise be payable as an indemnity for a terminal 25        illness;26            (R) An amount equal to the amount of any federal or   SB0219- 20 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        State bonus paid to veterans of the Persian Gulf War;2            (S) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 3        gross income, equal to the amount of a contribution 4        made in the taxable year on behalf of the taxpayer to a 5        medical care savings account established under the 6        Medical Care Savings Account Act or the Medical Care 7        Savings Account Act of 2000 to the extent the 8        contribution is accepted by the account administrator 9        as provided in that Act;10            (T) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 11        gross income, equal to the amount of interest earned 12        in the taxable year on a medical care savings account 13        established under the Medical Care Savings Account Act 14        or the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2000 on 15        behalf of the taxpayer, other than interest added 16        pursuant to item (D-5) of this paragraph (2);17            (U) For one taxable year beginning on or after 18        January 1, 1994, an amount equal to the total amount of 19        tax imposed and paid under subsections (a) and (b) of 20        Section 201 of this Act on grant amounts received by 21        the taxpayer under the Nursing Home Grant Assistance 22        Act during the taxpayer's taxable years 1992 and 1993;23            (V) Beginning with tax years ending on or after 24        December 31, 1995 and ending with tax years ending on 25        or before December 31, 2004, an amount equal to the 26        amount paid by a taxpayer who is a self-employed   SB0219- 21 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        taxpayer, a partner of a partnership, or a shareholder 2        in a Subchapter S corporation for health insurance or 3        long-term care insurance for that taxpayer or that 4        taxpayer's spouse or dependents, to the extent that 5        the amount paid for that health insurance or long-term 6        care insurance may be deducted under Section 213 of 7        the Internal Revenue Code, has not been deducted on 8        the federal income tax return of the taxpayer, and 9        does not exceed the taxable income attributable to 10        that taxpayer's income, self-employment income, or 11        Subchapter S corporation income; except that no 12        deduction shall be allowed under this item (V) if the 13        taxpayer is eligible to participate in any health 14        insurance or long-term care insurance plan of an 15        employer of the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse. The 16        amount of the health insurance and long-term care 17        insurance subtracted under this item (V) shall be 18        determined by multiplying total health insurance and 19        long-term care insurance premiums paid by the taxpayer 20        times a number that represents the fractional 21        percentage of eligible medical expenses under Section 22        213 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 not actually 23        deducted on the taxpayer's federal income tax return;24            (W) For taxable years beginning on or after 25        January 1, 1998, all amounts included in the 26        taxpayer's federal gross income in the taxable year   SB0219- 22 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        from amounts converted from a regular IRA to a Roth 2        IRA. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 3        Section 250;4            (X) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 5        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 6        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 7        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 8        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 9        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 10        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 11        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 12        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 13        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 14        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 15        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 16        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 17        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 18        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 19        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 20        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 21        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 22        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 23        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 24        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 25        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 26        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this   SB0219- 23 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 2        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 3        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 4        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 5        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 6        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 7        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 8        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 9        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 10        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;11            (Y) For taxable years beginning on or after 12        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 13        2004, moneys contributed in the taxable year to a 14        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 15        State Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from 16        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 17        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 18        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For taxable 19        years beginning on or after January 1, 2005, a maximum 20        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to (i) a 21        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 22        State Treasurer Act or (ii) the Illinois Prepaid 23        Tuition Trust Fund, except that amounts excluded from 24        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 25        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 26        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For purposes   SB0219- 24 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        of this subparagraph, contributions made by an 2        employer on behalf of an employee, or matching 3        contributions made by an employee, shall be treated as 4        made by the employee. This subparagraph (Y) is exempt 5        from the provisions of Section 250;6            (Z) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 7        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 8        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 9        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 10        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 11        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:12                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 13            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 14            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 15            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 16            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 17            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 18            including the bonus depreciation deduction;19                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 20            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 21            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 22            0.429); and23                (3) for taxable years ending after December 24            31, 2005:25                    (i) for property on which a bonus 26                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted   SB0219- 25 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 2                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 3                by 0.429);4                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 5                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 6                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 7                1.0;8                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 9                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 10                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 11                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 12                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 13                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 14                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 15                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 16                depreciation on that property; and17                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 18                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 19                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 20                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 21                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 22                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 23                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 24                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 25                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 26                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)).   SB0219- 26 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1            The aggregate amount deducted under this 2        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 3        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 4        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 5        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 6        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 7        subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the provisions of 8        Section 250;9            (AA) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 10        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 11        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 12        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 13        an amount equal to that addition modification. 14            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 15        the last day of the last tax year for which a 16        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 17        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 18        required in any taxable year to make an addition 19        modification under subparagraph (D-15), then an amount 20        equal to that addition modification. 21            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 22        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 23        one piece of property.24            This subparagraph (AA) is exempt from the 25        provisions of Section 250;26            (BB) Any amount included in adjusted gross income,   SB0219- 27 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        other than salary, received by a driver in a 2        ridesharing arrangement using a motor vehicle;3            (CC) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 4        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 5        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 6        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 7        modification with respect to such transaction under 8        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 9        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 10        the amount of that addition modification, and (ii) any 11        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 12        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 13        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 14        that is required to make an addition modification with 15        respect to such transaction under Section 16        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 17        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of that 18        addition modification. This subparagraph (CC) is 19        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;20            (DD) An amount equal to the interest income taken 21        into account for the taxable year (net of the 22        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 23        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 24        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 25        for the fact that the foreign person's business 26        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of   SB0219- 28 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 2        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 3        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 4        business group but for the fact that the person is 5        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 6        included in the unitary business group because he or 7        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 8        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 9        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 10        made for the same taxable year under Section 11        203(a)(2)(D-17) for interest paid, accrued, or 12        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 13        This subparagraph (DD) is exempt from the provisions 14        of Section 250; 15            (EE) An amount equal to the income from intangible 16        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 17        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 18        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 19        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 20        for the fact that the foreign person's business 21        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 22        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 23        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 24        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 25        business group but for the fact that the person is 26        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being   SB0219- 29 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        included in the unitary business group because he or 2        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 3        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 4        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 5        made for the same taxable year under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-18) for intangible expenses and costs 7        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 8        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (EE) is 9        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;10            (FF) An amount equal to any amount awarded to the 11        taxpayer during the taxable year by the Court of 12        Claims under subsection (c) of Section 8 of the Court 13        of Claims Act for time unjustly served in a State 14        prison. This subparagraph (FF) is exempt from the 15        provisions of Section 250; 16            (GG) For taxable years ending on or after December 17        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 18        add back any insurance premiums under Section 19        203(a)(2)(D-19), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 20        that part of a reimbursement received from the 21        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 22        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 23        company) that would have been taken into account as a 24        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 25        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 26        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph   SB0219- 30 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        (GG), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 2        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 3        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (GG). This 4        subparagraph (GG) is exempt from the provisions of 5        Section 250; 6            (HH) For taxable years beginning on or after 7        January 1, 2018 and prior to January 1, 2028, a maximum 8        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to a 9        qualified ABLE account under Section 16.6 of the State 10        Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from gross 11        income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) or Section 12        529A(c)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not 13        be considered moneys contributed under this 14        subparagraph (HH). For purposes of this subparagraph 15        (HH), contributions made by an employer on behalf of 16        an employee, or matching contributions made by an 17        employee, shall be treated as made by the employee; 18            (II) For taxable years that begin on or after 19        January 1, 2021 and begin before January 1, 2026, the 20        amount that is included in the taxpayer's federal 21        adjusted gross income pursuant to Section 61 of the 22        Internal Revenue Code as discharge of indebtedness 23        attributable to student loan forgiveness and that is 24        not excluded from the taxpayer's federal adjusted 25        gross income pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection 26        (f) of Section 108 of the Internal Revenue Code;   SB0219- 31 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1            (JJ) For taxable years beginning on or after 2        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 3        operating in this State and licensed under the 4        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 5        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 6        organization operating in this State and licensed 7        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 8        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 9        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 10        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 11        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 12        this subparagraph (JJ) are exempt from the provisions 13        of Section 250; and 14            (KK) To the extent includible in gross income for 15        federal income tax purposes, any amount awarded or 16        paid to the taxpayer as a result of a judgment or 17        settlement for fertility fraud as provided in Section 18        15 of the Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, donor 19        fertility fraud as provided in Section 20 of the 20        Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, or similar action in 21        another state; and 22            (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 23        January 1, 2026, if the taxpayer is a qualified 24        worker, as defined in the Workforce Development 25        through Charitable Loan Repayment Act, an amount equal 26        to the amount included in the taxpayer's federal   SB0219- 32 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        adjusted gross income that is attributable to student 2        loan repayment assistance received by the taxpayer 3        during the taxable year from a qualified community 4        foundation under the provisions of the Workforce 5        Development through Through Charitable Loan Repayment 6        Act. 7            This subparagraph (LL) is exempt from the 8        provisions of Section 250; . 9            (MM) (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 10        January 1, 2025, if the taxpayer is an eligible 11        resident as defined in the Medical Debt Relief Act, an 12        amount equal to the amount included in the taxpayer's 13        federal adjusted gross income that is attributable to 14        medical debt relief received by the taxpayer during 15        the taxable year from a nonprofit medical debt relief 16        coordinator under the provisions of the Medical Debt 17        Relief Act. This subparagraph (MM) (LL) is exempt from 18        the provisions of Section 250; and . 19            (NN) For taxable years beginning on or after 20        January 1, 2026, if the taxpayer is a law enforcement 21        officer, an amount equal to the amount of overtime 22        compensation that is paid to the taxpayer during the 23        taxable year for the taxpayer's service as a law 24        enforcement officer and that is included in the 25        taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income; as used in 26        this subparagraph (NN), "law enforcement officer"   SB0219- 33 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        means any person employed by a State, county, or 2        municipality as a policeman, as a peace officer, or in 3        a like position involving the enforcement of the law 4        and the protection of the public interest; as used in 5        this subparagraph (NN), "overtime compensation" has 6        the meaning given to that term in the federal Fair 7        Labor Standards Act; this subparagraph (NN) is exempt 8        from the provisions of Section 250.  9    (b) Corporations.10        (1) In general. In the case of a corporation, base 11    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 12    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).13        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 14    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 15    of the following amounts:16            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 17        to the taxpayer as interest and all distributions 18        received from regulated investment companies during 19        the taxable year to the extent excluded from gross 20        income in the computation of taxable income;21            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 22        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 23        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 24        year;25            (C) In the case of a regulated investment company,   SB0219- 34 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        an amount equal to the excess of (i) the net long-term 2        capital gain for the taxable year, over (ii) the 3        amount of the capital gain dividends designated as 4        such in accordance with Section 852(b)(3)(C) of the 5        Internal Revenue Code and any amount designated under 6        Section 852(b)(3)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, 7        attributable to the taxable year (this amendatory Act 8        of 1995 (Public Act 89-89) is declarative of existing 9        law and is not a new enactment);10            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 11        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 12        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 13        ending prior to December 31, 1986;14            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 15        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 16        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 17        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 18        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 19        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 20        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 21        subtraction modifications in such earlier taxable 22        year, with the following limitations applied in the 23        order that they are listed:24                (i) the addition modification relating to the 25            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 26            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to   SB0219- 35 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 2            of addition modification under this subparagraph 3            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 4            which was taken into account in calculating the 5            base income of an earlier taxable year, and6                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 7            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 8            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 9            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 10            such carryback or carryforward;11            For taxable years in which there is a net 12        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 13        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 14        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 15        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 16        computed independently under the preceding provisions 17        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;18            (E-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 19        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 20        costs that the corporation deducted in computing 21        adjusted gross income and for which the corporation 22        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;23            (E-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 24        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 25        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 26        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of   SB0219- 36 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        the Internal Revenue Code;2            (E-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 3        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 4        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 5        addition modification under subparagraph (E-10), then 6        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 7        deductions taken in all taxable years under 8        subparagraph (T) with respect to that property.9            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 10        the last day of the last tax year for which a 11        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 12        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 13        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 14        modification under subparagraph (T), then an amount 15        equal to that subtraction modification. 16            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 17        modification under this subparagraph only once with 18        respect to any one piece of property;19            (E-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 20        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 21        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 22        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 23        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 24        member of the same unitary business group but for the 25        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 26        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign   SB0219- 37 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 2        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 3        who would be a member of the same unitary business 4        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 5        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 6        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 7        required to apportion business income under different 8        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 9        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 10        extent that dividends were included in base income of 11        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 12        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 13        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 14        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 15        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 16        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 17        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 18        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 19        accrued, or incurred. 20            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 21                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 22            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 23            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 24            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 25            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 26            with respect to such interest; or  SB0219- 38 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 2            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 3            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 4            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 5            following:6                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 7                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 8                to a person that is not a related member, and9                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 10                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 11                person did not have as a principal purpose the 12                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 13                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 14                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 15                terms; or 16                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 17            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 18            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 19            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 20            and terms and the principal purpose for the 21            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 22            or 23                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 24            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 25            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 26            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or   SB0219- 39 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 2            to the application or use of an alternative method 3            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 4                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 5            Director from making any other adjustment 6            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 7            for any tax year beginning after the effective 8            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 9            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 10            Department and such regulations provide methods 11            and standards by which the Department will utilize 12            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 13            (E-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 14        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 15        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 16        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 17        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 18        foreign person who would be a member of the same 19        unitary business group but for the fact that the 20        foreign person's business activity outside the United 21        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 22        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 23        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 24        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 25        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 26        from being included in the unitary business group   SB0219- 40 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 2        business income under different subsections of Section 3        304. The addition modification required by this 4        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 5        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 6        group for the same taxable year and received by the 7        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 8        business group (including amounts included in gross 9        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 10        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 11        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 12        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 13        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 14        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 15        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 16        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 17        modification required under Section 203(b)(2)(E-12) of 18        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 19        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 20        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 21        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 22        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 23        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 24        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 25        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 26        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other   SB0219- 41 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 2        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 3        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 4        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 5        similar types of intangible assets.6            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:7                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 8            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 9            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 10            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 11            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 12            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 13            with respect to such item; or14                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 15            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 16            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 17            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 18            following:19                    (a) the person during the same taxable 20                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 21                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 22                not a related member, and23                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 24                intangible expense or cost between the 25                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 26                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois   SB0219- 42 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 2                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 3                or4                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 5            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 6            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 7            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 8            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 9            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 10            writing to the application or use of an 11            alternative method of apportionment under Section 12            304(f); 13                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 14            Director from making any other adjustment 15            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 16            for any tax year beginning after the effective 17            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 18            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 19            Department and such regulations provide methods 20            and standards by which the Department will utilize 21            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 22            (E-14) For taxable years ending on or after 23        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 24        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 25        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 26        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to   SB0219- 43 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 2        business group but for the fact that the person is 3        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 4        included in the unitary business group because he or 5        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 6        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 7        addition modification required by this subparagraph 8        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 9        included in base income of the unitary group for the 10        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 11        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 12        (including amounts included in gross income under 13        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 14        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 15        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 16        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 17        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 18        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 19        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 20        the addition modification required under Section 21        203(b)(2)(E-12) or Section 203(b)(2)(E-13) of this 22        Act; 23            (E-15) For taxable years beginning after December 24        31, 2008, any deduction for dividends paid by a 25        captive real estate investment trust that is allowed 26        to a real estate investment trust under Section   SB0219- 44 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        857(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code for 2        dividends paid;3            (E-16) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 4        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 5        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 6        Act;7            (E-17) For taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 9        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 10        for the taxable year; 11            (E-18) for taxable years beginning after December 12        31, 2018, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 13        under Section 250(a)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue 14        Code for the taxable year; 15            (E-19) for taxable years ending on or after June 16        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 17        under Section 250(a)(1)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue 18        Code for the taxable year; 19            (E-20) for taxable years ending on or after June 20        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 21        under Sections 243(e) and 245A(a) of the Internal 22        Revenue Code for the taxable year; 23            (E-21) the amount that is claimed as a federal 24        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 25        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 26        attributable to an endowment gift for which the   SB0219- 45 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 2        Tax Credit Act; 3    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 4    following amounts:5            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 6        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 7        and included in such total for the taxable year;8            (G) An amount equal to any amount included in such 9        total under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code;10            (H) In the case of a regulated investment company, 11        an amount equal to the amount of exempt interest 12        dividends as defined in subsection (b)(5) of Section 13        852 of the Internal Revenue Code, paid to shareholders 14        for the taxable year;15            (I) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 16        under subparagraph (J), an amount equal to the sum of 17        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 18        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) and amounts disallowed as 19        interest expense by Section 291(a)(3) of the Internal 20        Revenue Code, and all amounts of expenses allocable to 21        interest and disallowed as deductions by Section 22        265(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for 23        taxable years ending on or after August 13, 1999, 24        Sections 171(a)(2), 265, 280C, 291(a)(3), and 25        832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, plus, 26        for tax years ending on or after December 31, 2011,   SB0219- 46 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        amounts disallowed as deductions by Section 45G(e)(3) 2        of the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 3        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 4        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 5        Internal Revenue Code and the policyholders' share of 6        tax-exempt interest of a life insurance company under 7        Section 807(a)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 8        the case of a life insurance company with gross income 9        from a decrease in reserves for the tax year) or 10        Section 807(b)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 11        the case of a life insurance company allowed a 12        deduction for an increase in reserves for the tax 13        year); the provisions of this subparagraph are exempt 14        from the provisions of Section 250;15            (J) An amount equal to all amounts included in 16        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 17        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 18        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 19        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 20        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 21        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 22        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 23        net of bond premium amortization;24            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 25        such total which were paid by a corporation which 26        conducts business operations in a River Edge   SB0219- 47 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 2        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 3        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 4        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 5        the provisions of Section 250;6            (L) An amount equal to those dividends included in 7        such total that were paid by a corporation that 8        conducts business operations in a federally designated 9        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 10        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 11        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 12        subparagraph (K) of paragraph 2 of this subsection 13        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 14        this subparagraph (L);15            (M) For any taxpayer that is a financial 16        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 17        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 18        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 19        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 20        property which is eligible for the River Edge 21        Redevelopment Zone Investment Credit. To determine the 22        portion of a loan or loans that is secured by property 23        eligible for a Section 201(f) investment credit to the 24        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 25        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 26        divided into the basis of the Section 201(f)   SB0219- 48 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        investment credit property which secures the loan or 2        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 3        such property on the date that it was placed in service 4        in the River Edge Redevelopment Zone. The subtraction 5        modification available to the taxpayer in any year 6        under this subsection shall be that portion of the 7        total interest paid by the borrower with respect to 8        such loan attributable to the eligible property as 9        calculated under the previous sentence. This 10        subparagraph (M) is exempt from the provisions of 11        Section 250;12            (M-1) For any taxpayer that is a financial 13        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 14        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 15        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 16        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 17        property which is eligible for the High Impact 18        Business Investment Credit. To determine the portion 19        of a loan or loans that is secured by property eligible 20        for a Section 201(h) investment credit to the 21        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 22        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 23        divided into the basis of the Section 201(h) 24        investment credit property which secures the loan or 25        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 26        such property on the date that it was placed in service   SB0219- 49 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        in a federally designated Foreign Trade Zone or 2        Sub-Zone located in Illinois. No taxpayer that is 3        eligible for the deduction provided in subparagraph 4        (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be 5        eligible for the deduction provided under this 6        subparagraph (M-1). The subtraction modification 7        available to taxpayers in any year under this 8        subsection shall be that portion of the total interest 9        paid by the borrower with respect to such loan 10        attributable to the eligible property as calculated 11        under the previous sentence;12            (N) Two times any contribution made during the 13        taxable year to a designated zone organization to the 14        extent that the contribution (i) qualifies as a 15        charitable contribution under subsection (c) of 16        Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code and (ii) 17        must, by its terms, be used for a project approved by 18        the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 19        under Section 11 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act 20        or under Section 10-10 of the River Edge Redevelopment 21        Zone Act. This subparagraph (N) is exempt from the 22        provisions of Section 250;23            (O) An amount equal to: (i) 85% for taxable years 24        ending on or before December 31, 1992, or, a 25        percentage equal to the percentage allowable under 26        Section 243(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986   SB0219- 50 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        for taxable years ending after December 31, 1992, of 2        the amount by which dividends included in taxable 3        income and received from a corporation that is not 4        created or organized under the laws of the United 5        States or any state or political subdivision thereof, 6        including, for taxable years ending on or after 7        December 31, 1988, dividends received or deemed 8        received or paid or deemed paid under Sections 951 9        through 965 of the Internal Revenue Code, exceed the 10        amount of the modification provided under subparagraph 11        (G) of paragraph (2) of this subsection (b) which is 12        related to such dividends, and including, for taxable 13        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 14        received from a captive real estate investment trust; 15        plus (ii) 100% of the amount by which dividends, 16        included in taxable income and received, including, 17        for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 18        1988, dividends received or deemed received or paid or 19        deemed paid under Sections 951 through 964 of the 20        Internal Revenue Code and including, for taxable years 21        ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 22        received from a captive real estate investment trust, 23        from any such corporation specified in clause (i) that 24        would but for the provisions of Section 1504(b)(3) of 25        the Internal Revenue Code be treated as a member of the 26        affiliated group which includes the dividend   SB0219- 51 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        recipient, exceed the amount of the modification 2        provided under subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of 3        this subsection (b) which is related to such 4        dividends. For taxable years ending on or after June 5        30, 2021, (i) for purposes of this subparagraph, the 6        term "dividend" does not include any amount treated as 7        a dividend under Section 1248 of the Internal Revenue 8        Code, and (ii) this subparagraph shall not apply to 9        dividends for which a deduction is allowed under 10        Section 245(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. This 11        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 12        Section 250 of this Act;13            (P) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 14        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 15        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;16            (Q) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 17        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 18        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 19        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 20        the Internal Revenue Code;21            (R) On and after July 20, 1999, in the case of an 22        attorney-in-fact with respect to whom an interinsurer 23        or a reciprocal insurer has made the election under 24        Section 835 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 25        835, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the 26        amounts paid or incurred by that interinsurer or   SB0219- 52 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        reciprocal insurer in the taxable year to the 2        attorney-in-fact over the deduction allowed to that 3        interinsurer or reciprocal insurer with respect to the 4        attorney-in-fact under Section 835(b) of the Internal 5        Revenue Code for the taxable year; the provisions of 6        this subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of 7        Section 250;8            (S) For taxable years ending on or after December 9        31, 1997, in the case of a Subchapter S corporation, an 10        amount equal to all amounts of income allocable to a 11        shareholder subject to the Personal Property Tax 12        Replacement Income Tax imposed by subsections (c) and 13        (d) of Section 201 of this Act, including amounts 14        allocable to organizations exempt from federal income 15        tax by reason of Section 501(a) of the Internal 16        Revenue Code. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 17        provisions of Section 250;18            (T) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 19        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 20        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 21        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 22        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 23        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:24                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 25            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 26            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property   SB0219- 53 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 2            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 3            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 4            including the bonus depreciation deduction;5                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 6            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 7            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 8            0.429); and9                (3) for taxable years ending after December 10            31, 2005:11                    (i) for property on which a bonus 12                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 13                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 14                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 15                by 0.429);16                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 17                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 18                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 19                1.0;20                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 21                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 22                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 23                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 24                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 25                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 26                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the   SB0219- 54 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 2                depreciation on that property; and3                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 4                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 5                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 6                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 7                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 8                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 9                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 10                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 11                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 12                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 13            The aggregate amount deducted under this 14        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 15        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 16        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 17        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 18        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 19        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 20        Section 250;21            (U) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 22        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 23        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 24        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 25        equal to that addition modification.26            If the taxpayer continues to own property through   SB0219- 55 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        the last day of the last tax year for which a 2        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 3        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 4        required in any taxable year to make an addition 5        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 6        equal to that addition modification. 7            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 8        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 9        one piece of property.10            This subparagraph (U) is exempt from the 11        provisions of Section 250;12            (V) The amount of: (i) any interest income (net of 13        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 14        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 15        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 16        modification with respect to such transaction under 17        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 18        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 19        the amount of such addition modification, (ii) any 20        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 21        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 22        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 23        that is required to make an addition modification with 24        respect to such transaction under Section 25        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 26        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such   SB0219- 56 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        addition modification, and (iii) any insurance premium 2        income (net of deductions allocable thereto) taken 3        into account for the taxable year with respect to a 4        transaction with a taxpayer that is required to make 5        an addition modification with respect to such 6        transaction under Section 203(a)(2)(D-19), Section 7        203(b)(2)(E-14), Section 203(c)(2)(G-14), or Section 8        203(d)(2)(D-9), but not to exceed the amount of that 9        addition modification. This subparagraph (V) is exempt 10        from the provisions of Section 250; 11            (W) An amount equal to the interest income taken 12        into account for the taxable year (net of the 13        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 14        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 15        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 16        for the fact that the foreign person's business 17        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 18        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 19        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 20        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 21        business group but for the fact that the person is 22        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 23        included in the unitary business group because he or 24        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 25        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 26        not to exceed the addition modification required to be   SB0219- 57 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        made for the same taxable year under Section 2        203(b)(2)(E-12) for interest paid, accrued, or 3        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 4        This subparagraph (W) is exempt from the provisions of 5        Section 250; 6            (X) An amount equal to the income from intangible 7        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 8        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 9        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 10        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 11        for the fact that the foreign person's business 12        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 13        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 14        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 15        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 16        business group but for the fact that the person is 17        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 18        included in the unitary business group because he or 19        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 20        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 21        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 22        made for the same taxable year under Section 23        203(b)(2)(E-13) for intangible expenses and costs 24        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 25        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (X) is 26        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;   SB0219- 58 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 2        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 3        add back any insurance premiums under Section 4        203(b)(2)(E-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 5        that part of a reimbursement received from the 6        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 7        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 8        company) that would have been taken into account as a 9        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 10        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 11        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 12        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 13        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 14        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 15        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 16        Section 250; 17            (Z) The difference between the nondeductible 18        controlled foreign corporation dividends under Section 19        965(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code over the 20        taxable income of the taxpayer, computed without 21        regard to Section 965(e)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue 22        Code, and without regard to any net operating loss 23        deduction. This subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the 24        provisions of Section 250; and 25            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 26        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment   SB0219- 59 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        operating in this State and licensed under the 2        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 3        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 4        organization operating in this State and licensed 5        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 6        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 7        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 8        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 9        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 10        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 11        of Section 250. 12        (3) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (2)(A), 13    "gross income" in the case of a life insurance company, 14    for tax years ending on and after December 31, 1994, and 15    prior to December 31, 2011, shall mean the gross 16    investment income for the taxable year and, for tax years 17    ending on or after December 31, 2011, shall mean all 18    amounts included in life insurance gross income under 19    Section 803(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. 20    (c) Trusts and estates.21        (1) In general. In the case of a trust or estate, base 22    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 23    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).24        (2) Modifications. Subject to the provisions of 25    paragraph (3), the taxable income referred to in paragraph   SB0219- 60 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1    (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum of the 2    following amounts:3            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 4        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 5        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 6        in the computation of taxable income;7            (B) In the case of (i) an estate, $600; (ii) a 8        trust which, under its governing instrument, is 9        required to distribute all of its income currently, 10        $300; and (iii) any other trust, $100, but in each such 11        case, only to the extent such amount was deducted in 12        the computation of taxable income;13            (C) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 14        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 15        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 16        year;17            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 18        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 19        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 20        ending prior to December 31, 1986;21            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 22        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 23        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 24        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 25        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 26        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other   SB0219- 61 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 2        subtraction modifications in such taxable year, with 3        the following limitations applied in the order that 4        they are listed:5                (i) the addition modification relating to the 6            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 7            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 8            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 9            of addition modification under this subparagraph 10            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 11            which was taken into account in calculating the 12            base income of an earlier taxable year, and13                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 14            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 15            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 16            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 17            such carryback or carryforward;18            For taxable years in which there is a net 19        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 20        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 21        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 22        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 23        computed independently under the preceding provisions 24        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;25            (F) For taxable years ending on or after January 26        1, 1989, an amount equal to the tax deducted pursuant   SB0219- 62 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        to Section 164 of the Internal Revenue Code if the 2        trust or estate is claiming the same tax for purposes 3        of the Illinois foreign tax credit under Section 601 4        of this Act;5            (G) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 6        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 7        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 8        computation of taxable income;9            (G-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 10        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 11        costs that the trust or estate deducted in computing 12        adjusted gross income and for which the trust or 13        estate claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 14        201;15            (G-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 16        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 17        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 18        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 19        the Internal Revenue Code; and20            (G-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 21        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 22        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 23        addition modification under subparagraph (G-10), then 24        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 25        deductions taken in all taxable years under 26        subparagraph (R) with respect to that property.  SB0219- 63 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 2        the last day of the last tax year for which a 3        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 4        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 5        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 6        modification under subparagraph (R), then an amount 7        equal to that subtraction modification. 8            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 9        modification under this subparagraph only once with 10        respect to any one piece of property;11            (G-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 12        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 13        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 14        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 15        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 16        member of the same unitary business group but for the 17        fact that the foreign person's business activity 18        outside the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 19        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 20        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 21        who would be a member of the same unitary business 22        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 23        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 24        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 25        required to apportion business income under different 26        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification   SB0219- 64 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 2        extent that dividends were included in base income of 3        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 4        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 5        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 6        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 7        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 8        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 9        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 10        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 11        accrued, or incurred. 12            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 13                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 14            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 15            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 16            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 17            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 18            with respect to such interest; or19                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 20            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 21            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 22            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 23            following:24                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 25                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 26                to a person that is not a related member, and  SB0219- 65 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 2                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 3                person did not have as a principal purpose the 4                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 5                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 6                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 7                terms; or 8                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 9            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 10            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 11            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 12            and terms and the principal purpose for the 13            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 14            or 15                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 16            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 17            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 18            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 19            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 20            to the application or use of an alternative method 21            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 22                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 23            Director from making any other adjustment 24            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 25            for any tax year beginning after the effective 26            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is   SB0219- 66 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 2            Department and such regulations provide methods 3            and standards by which the Department will utilize 4            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 5            (G-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 6        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 7        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 8        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 9        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 10        foreign person who would be a member of the same 11        unitary business group but for the fact that the 12        foreign person's business activity outside the United 13        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 14        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 15        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 16        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 17        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 18        from being included in the unitary business group 19        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 20        business income under different subsections of Section 21        304. The addition modification required by this 22        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 23        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 24        group for the same taxable year and received by the 25        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 26        business group (including amounts included in gross   SB0219- 67 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 2        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 3        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 4        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 5        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 6        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 7        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 8        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 9        modification required under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) of 10        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 11        "intangible expenses and costs" includes: (1) 12        expenses, losses, and costs for or related to the 13        direct or indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or 14        management, ownership, sale, exchange, or any other 15        disposition of intangible property; (2) losses 16        incurred, directly or indirectly, from factoring 17        transactions or discounting transactions; (3) royalty, 18        patent, technical, and copyright fees; (4) licensing 19        fees; and (5) other similar expenses and costs. For 20        purposes of this subparagraph, "intangible property" 21        includes patents, patent applications, trade names, 22        trademarks, service marks, copyrights, mask works, 23        trade secrets, and similar types of intangible assets.24            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:25                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 26            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or   SB0219- 68 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 2            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 3            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 4            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 5            with respect to such item; or6                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 7            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 8            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 9            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 10            following:11                    (a) the person during the same taxable 12                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 13                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 14                not a related member, and15                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 16                intangible expense or cost between the 17                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 18                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 19                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 20                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 21                or22                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 23            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 24            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 25            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 26            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable;   SB0219- 69 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 2            writing to the application or use of an 3            alternative method of apportionment under Section 4            304(f); 5                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 6            Director from making any other adjustment 7            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 8            for any tax year beginning after the effective 9            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 10            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 11            Department and such regulations provide methods 12            and standards by which the Department will utilize 13            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 14            (G-14) For taxable years ending on or after 15        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 16        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 17        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 18        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 19        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 20        business group but for the fact that the person is 21        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 22        included in the unitary business group because he or 23        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 24        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 25        addition modification required by this subparagraph 26        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were   SB0219- 70 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        included in base income of the unitary group for the 2        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 3        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 4        (including amounts included in gross income under 5        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 6        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 7        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 8        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 9        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 10        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 11        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 12        the addition modification required under Section 13        203(c)(2)(G-12) or Section 203(c)(2)(G-13) of this 14        Act;15            (G-15) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 16        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 17        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 18        Act;19            (G-16) For taxable years ending on or after 20        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 21        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 22        for the taxable year; 23            (G-17) the amount that is claimed as a federal 24        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 25        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 26        attributable to an endowment gift for which the   SB0219- 71 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 2        Tax Credit Act; 3    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 4    following amounts:5            (H) An amount equal to all amounts included in 6        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 7        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a) and 408 8        of the Internal Revenue Code or included in such total 9        as distributions under the provisions of any 10        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 11        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 12        retired partners, which payments are excluded in 13        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 14        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 15        adopted pursuant thereto;16            (I) The valuation limitation amount;17            (J) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 18        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 19        and included in such total for the taxable year;20            (K) An amount equal to all amounts included in 21        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 22        (C), (D), (E), (F) and (G) which are exempt from 23        taxation by this State either by reason of its 24        statutes or Constitution or by reason of the 25        Constitution, treaties or statutes of the United 26        States; provided that, in the case of any statute of   SB0219- 72 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        this State that exempts income derived from bonds or 2        other obligations from the tax imposed under this Act, 3        the amount exempted shall be the interest net of bond 4        premium amortization;5            (L) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 6        under subparagraph (K), an amount equal to the sum of 7        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 8        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 9        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 10        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 11        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 12        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 13        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 14        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 15        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 16        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 17        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 18        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 19        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 20        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 21        250;22            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 23        such total which were paid by a corporation which 24        conducts business operations in a River Edge 25        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 26        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially   SB0219- 73 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 2        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (M) is exempt from 3        the provisions of Section 250;4            (N) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 5        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 6        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;7            (O) An amount equal to those dividends included in 8        such total that were paid by a corporation that 9        conducts business operations in a federally designated 10        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 11        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 12        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 13        subparagraph (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 14        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 15        this subparagraph (O);16            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 17        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 18        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 19        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 20        the Internal Revenue Code;21            (Q) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 22        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 23        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 24        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 25        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 26        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis   SB0219- 74 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 2        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 3        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 4        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 5        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 6        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 7        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 8        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 9        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 10        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 11        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 12        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 13        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 14        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 15        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 16        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 17        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this 18        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 19        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 20        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 21        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 22        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 23        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 24        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 25        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 26        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is   SB0219- 75 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;2            (R) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 3        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 4        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 5        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 6        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 7        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:8                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 9            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 10            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 11            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 12            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 13            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 14            including the bonus depreciation deduction;15                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 16            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 17            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 18            0.429); and19                (3) for taxable years ending after December 20            31, 2005:21                    (i) for property on which a bonus 22                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 23                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 24                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 25                by 0.429);26                    (ii) for property on which a bonus   SB0219- 76 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 2                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 3                1.0;4                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 5                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 6                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 7                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 8                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 9                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 10                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 11                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 12                depreciation on that property; and13                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 14                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 15                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 16                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 17                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 18                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 19                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 20                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 21                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 22                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 23            The aggregate amount deducted under this 24        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 25        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 26        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the   SB0219- 77 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 2        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 3        subparagraph (R) is exempt from the provisions of 4        Section 250;5            (S) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 6        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 7        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 8        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount 9        equal to that addition modification.10            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 11        the last day of the last tax year for which a 12        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 13        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 14        required in any taxable year to make an addition 15        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount 16        equal to that addition modification. 17            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 18        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 19        one piece of property.20            This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 21        provisions of Section 250;22            (T) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 23        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 24        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 25        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 26        modification with respect to such transaction under   SB0219- 78 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 2        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 3        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 4        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 5        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 6        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 7        that is required to make an addition modification with 8        respect to such transaction under Section 9        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 10        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 11        addition modification. This subparagraph (T) is exempt 12        from the provisions of Section 250; 13            (U) An amount equal to the interest income taken 14        into account for the taxable year (net of the 15        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 16        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 17        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 18        for the fact the foreign person's business activity 19        outside the United States is 80% or more of that 20        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 21        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 22        who would be a member of the same unitary business 23        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 24        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 25        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 26        required to apportion business income under different   SB0219- 79 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        subsections of Section 304, but not to exceed the 2        addition modification required to be made for the same 3        taxable year under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) for 4        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 5        indirectly, to the same person. This subparagraph (U) 6        is exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 7            (V) An amount equal to the income from intangible 8        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 9        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 10        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 11        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 12        for the fact that the foreign person's business 13        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 14        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 15        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 16        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 17        business group but for the fact that the person is 18        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 19        included in the unitary business group because he or 20        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 21        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 22        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 23        made for the same taxable year under Section 24        203(c)(2)(G-13) for intangible expenses and costs 25        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 26        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (V) is   SB0219- 80 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 2            (W) in the case of an estate, an amount equal to 3        all amounts included in such total pursuant to the 4        provisions of Section 111 of the Internal Revenue Code 5        as a recovery of items previously deducted by the 6        decedent from adjusted gross income in the computation 7        of taxable income. This subparagraph (W) is exempt 8        from Section 250; 9            (X) an amount equal to the refund included in such 10        total of any tax deducted for federal income tax 11        purposes, to the extent that deduction was added back 12        under subparagraph (F). This subparagraph (X) is 13        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;14            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 15        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 16        add back any insurance premiums under Section 17        203(c)(2)(G-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 18        that part of a reimbursement received from the 19        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 20        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 21        company) that would have been taken into account as a 22        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 23        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 24        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 25        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 26        add back to income the amount subtracted by the   SB0219- 81 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 2        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 3        Section 250;4            (Z) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 5        2018 and before January 1, 2026, the amount of excess 6        business loss of the taxpayer disallowed as a 7        deduction by Section 461(l)(1)(B) of the Internal 8        Revenue Code; and 9            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 10        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 11        operating in this State and licensed under the 12        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 13        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 14        organization operating in this State and licensed 15        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 16        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 17        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 18        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 19        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 20        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 21        of Section 250. 22        (3) Limitation. The amount of any modification 23    otherwise required under this subsection shall, under 24    regulations prescribed by the Department, be adjusted by 25    any amounts included therein which were properly paid, 26    credited, or required to be distributed, or permanently   SB0219- 82 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1    set aside for charitable purposes pursuant to Internal 2    Revenue Code Section 642(c) during the taxable year. 3    (d) Partnerships.4        (1) In general. In the case of a partnership, base 5    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 6    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).7        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 8    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 9    of the following amounts:10            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 11        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 12        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 13        in the computation of taxable income;14            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 15        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income for 16        the taxable year;17            (C) The amount of deductions allowed to the 18        partnership pursuant to Section 707 (c) of the 19        Internal Revenue Code in calculating its taxable 20        income;21            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 22        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 23        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 24        computation of taxable income;25            (D-5) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an   SB0219- 83 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 2        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 3        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 4        the Internal Revenue Code;5            (D-6) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 6        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 7        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 8        addition modification under subparagraph (D-5), then 9        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 10        deductions taken in all taxable years under 11        subparagraph (O) with respect to that property.12            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 13        the last day of the last tax year for which a 14        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 15        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 16        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 17        modification under subparagraph (O), then an amount 18        equal to that subtraction modification. 19            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 20        modification under this subparagraph only once with 21        respect to any one piece of property;22            (D-7) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 23        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 24        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 25        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 26        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a   SB0219- 84 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        member of the same unitary business group but for the 2        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 3        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 4        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 5        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 6        who would be a member of the same unitary business 7        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 8        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 9        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 10        required to apportion business income under different 11        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 12        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 13        extent that dividends were included in base income of 14        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 15        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 16        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 17        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 18        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 19        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 20        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 21        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 22        accrued, or incurred. 23            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 24                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 25            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 26            is subject in a foreign country or state, other   SB0219- 85 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 2            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 3            with respect to such interest; or4                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 5            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 6            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 7            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 8            following:9                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 10                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 11                to a person that is not a related member, and12                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 13                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 14                person did not have as a principal purpose the 15                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 16                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 17                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 18                terms; or 19                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 20            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 21            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 22            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 23            and terms and the principal purpose for the 24            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 25            or 26                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or   SB0219- 86 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 2            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 3            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 4            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 5            to the application or use of an alternative method 6            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 7                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 8            Director from making any other adjustment 9            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 10            for any tax year beginning after the effective 11            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 12            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 13            Department and such regulations provide methods 14            and standards by which the Department will utilize 15            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; and 16            (D-8) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 17        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 18        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 19        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 20        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 21        foreign person who would be a member of the same 22        unitary business group but for the fact that the 23        foreign person's business activity outside the United 24        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 25        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 26        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of   SB0219- 87 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 2        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 3        from being included in the unitary business group 4        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 5        business income under different subsections of Section 6        304. The addition modification required by this 7        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 8        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 9        group for the same taxable year and received by the 10        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 11        business group (including amounts included in gross 12        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 13        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 14        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 15        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 16        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 17        indirectly paid, incurred or accrued. The preceding 18        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 19        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 20        modification required under Section 203(d)(2)(D-7) of 21        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 22        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 23        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 24        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 25        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 26        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or   SB0219- 88 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 2        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 3        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 4        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 5        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 6        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 7        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 8        similar types of intangible assets;9            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:10                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 11            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 12            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 13            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 14            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 15            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 16            with respect to such item; or17                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 18            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 19            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 20            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 21            following:22                    (a) the person during the same taxable 23                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 24                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 25                not a related member, and26                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the   SB0219- 89 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1                intangible expense or cost between the 2                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 3                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 4                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 5                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 6                or7                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 8            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 9            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 10            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 11            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 12            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 13            writing to the application or use of an 14            alternative method of apportionment under Section 15            304(f); 16                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 17            Director from making any other adjustment 18            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 19            for any tax year beginning after the effective 20            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 21            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 22            Department and such regulations provide methods 23            and standards by which the Department will utilize 24            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 25            (D-9) For taxable years ending on or after 26        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of   SB0219- 90 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 2        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 3        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 4        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 5        business group but for the fact that the person is 6        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 7        included in the unitary business group because he or 8        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 9        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 10        addition modification required by this subparagraph 11        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 12        included in base income of the unitary group for the 13        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 14        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 15        (including amounts included in gross income under 16        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 17        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 18        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 19        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 20        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 21        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 22        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 23        the addition modification required under Section 24        203(d)(2)(D-7) or Section 203(d)(2)(D-8) of this Act;25            (D-10) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 26        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act,   SB0219- 91 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 2        Act;3            (D-11) For taxable years ending on or after 4        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 5        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 6        for the taxable year; 7            (D-12) the amount that is claimed as a federal 8        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 9        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 10        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 11        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 12        Tax Credit Act; 13    and by deducting from the total so obtained the following 14    amounts:15            (E) The valuation limitation amount;16            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 17        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 18        and included in such total for the taxable year;19            (G) An amount equal to all amounts included in 20        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 21        (C) and (D) which are exempt from taxation by this 22        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 23        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 24        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 25        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 26        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under   SB0219- 92 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 2        net of bond premium amortization;3            (H) Any income of the partnership which 4        constitutes personal service income as defined in 5        Section 1348(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code (as in 6        effect December 31, 1981) or a reasonable allowance 7        for compensation paid or accrued for services rendered 8        by partners to the partnership, whichever is greater; 9        this subparagraph (H) is exempt from the provisions of 10        Section 250;11            (I) An amount equal to all amounts of income 12        distributable to an entity subject to the Personal 13        Property Tax Replacement Income Tax imposed by 14        subsections (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act 15        including amounts distributable to organizations 16        exempt from federal income tax by reason of Section 17        501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; this subparagraph 18        (I) is exempt from the provisions of Section 250;19            (J) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 20        under subparagraph (G), an amount equal to the sum of 21        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 22        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 23        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 24        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 25        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 26        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections   SB0219- 93 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 2        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 3        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 4        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 5        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 6        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 7        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 8        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 9        250;10            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 11        such total which were paid by a corporation which 12        conducts business operations in a River Edge 13        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 14        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 15        all of its operations from a River Edge Redevelopment 16        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 17        the provisions of Section 250;18            (L) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 19        job training project established pursuant to the Real 20        Property Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;21            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 22        such total that were paid by a corporation that 23        conducts business operations in a federally designated 24        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 25        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 26        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in   SB0219- 94 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        subparagraph (K) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 2        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 3        this subparagraph (M);4            (N) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 5        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 6        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 7        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 8        the Internal Revenue Code;9            (O) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 10        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 11        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 12        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 13        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 14        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:15                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 16            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 17            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 18            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 19            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 20            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 21            including the bonus depreciation deduction;22                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 23            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 24            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 25            0.429); and26                (3) for taxable years ending after December   SB0219- 95 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1            31, 2005:2                    (i) for property on which a bonus 3                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 4                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 5                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 6                by 0.429);7                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 8                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 9                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 10                1.0;11                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 12                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 13                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 14                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 15                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 16                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 17                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 18                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 19                depreciation on that property; and20                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 21                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 22                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 23                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 24                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 25                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 26                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and   SB0219- 96 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 2                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 3                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 4            The aggregate amount deducted under this 5        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 6        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 7        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 8        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 9        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 10        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 11        Section 250;12            (P) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 13        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 14        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 15        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 16        equal to that addition modification.17            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 18        the last day of the last tax year for which a 19        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 20        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 21        required in any taxable year to make an addition 22        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 23        equal to that addition modification. 24            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 25        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 26        one piece of property.  SB0219- 97 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1            This subparagraph (P) is exempt from the 2        provisions of Section 250;3            (Q) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 4        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 5        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 6        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 7        modification with respect to such transaction under 8        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 9        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 10        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 11        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 12        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 13        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 14        that is required to make an addition modification with 15        respect to such transaction under Section 16        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 17        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 18        addition modification. This subparagraph (Q) is exempt 19        from Section 250; 20            (R) An amount equal to the interest income taken 21        into account for the taxable year (net of the 22        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 23        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 24        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 25        for the fact that the foreign person's business 26        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of   SB0219- 98 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 2        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 3        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 4        business group but for the fact that the person is 5        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 6        included in the unitary business group because he or 7        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 8        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 9        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 10        made for the same taxable year under Section 11        203(d)(2)(D-7) for interest paid, accrued, or 12        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 13        This subparagraph (R) is exempt from Section 250; 14            (S) An amount equal to the income from intangible 15        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 16        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 17        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 18        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 19        for the fact that the foreign person's business 20        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 21        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 22        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 23        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 24        business group but for the fact that the person is 25        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 26        included in the unitary business group because he or   SB0219- 99 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 2        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 3        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 4        made for the same taxable year under Section 5        203(d)(2)(D-8) for intangible expenses and costs paid, 6        accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to the 7        same person. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from 8        Section 250; 9            (T) For taxable years ending on or after December 10        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 11        add back any insurance premiums under Section 12        203(d)(2)(D-9), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 13        that part of a reimbursement received from the 14        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 15        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 16        company) that would have been taken into account as a 17        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 18        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 19        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 20        (T), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 21        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 22        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (T). This 23        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 24        Section 250; and 25            (U) For taxable years beginning on or after 26        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment   SB0219- 100 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        operating in this State and licensed under the 2        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 3        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 4        organization operating in this State and licensed 5        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 6        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 7        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 8        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 9        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 10        this subparagraph (U) are exempt from the provisions 11        of Section 250.  12    (e) Gross income; adjusted gross income; taxable income.13        (1) In general. Subject to the provisions of paragraph 14    (2) and subsection (b)(3), for purposes of this Section 15    and Section 803(e), a taxpayer's gross income, adjusted 16    gross income, or taxable income for the taxable year shall 17    mean the amount of gross income, adjusted gross income or 18    taxable income properly reportable for federal income tax 19    purposes for the taxable year under the provisions of the 20    Internal Revenue Code. Taxable income may be less than 21    zero. However, for taxable years ending on or after 22    December 31, 1986, net operating loss carryforwards from 23    taxable years ending prior to December 31, 1986, may not 24    exceed the sum of federal taxable income for the taxable 25    year before net operating loss deduction, plus the excess   SB0219- 101 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1    of addition modifications over subtraction modifications 2    for the taxable year. For taxable years ending prior to 3    December 31, 1986, taxable income may never be an amount 4    in excess of the net operating loss for the taxable year as 5    defined in subsections (c) and (d) of Section 172 of the 6    Internal Revenue Code, provided that when taxable income 7    of a corporation (other than a Subchapter S corporation), 8    trust, or estate is less than zero and addition 9    modifications, other than those provided by subparagraph 10    (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) for corporations or 11    subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) for 12    trusts and estates, exceed subtraction modifications, an 13    addition modification must be made under those 14    subparagraphs for any other taxable year to which the 15    taxable income less than zero (net operating loss) is 16    applied under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code or 17    under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 18    (e) applied in conjunction with Section 172 of the 19    Internal Revenue Code.20        (2) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (1) of 21    this subsection, the taxable income properly reportable 22    for federal income tax purposes shall mean:23            (A) Certain life insurance companies. In the case 24        of a life insurance company subject to the tax imposed 25        by Section 801 of the Internal Revenue Code, life 26        insurance company taxable income, plus the amount of   SB0219- 102 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        distribution from pre-1984 policyholder surplus 2        accounts as calculated under Section 815a of the 3        Internal Revenue Code;4            (B) Certain other insurance companies. In the case 5        of mutual insurance companies subject to the tax 6        imposed by Section 831 of the Internal Revenue Code, 7        insurance company taxable income;8            (C) Regulated investment companies. In the case of 9        a regulated investment company subject to the tax 10        imposed by Section 852 of the Internal Revenue Code, 11        investment company taxable income;12            (D) Real estate investment trusts. In the case of 13        a real estate investment trust subject to the tax 14        imposed by Section 857 of the Internal Revenue Code, 15        real estate investment trust taxable income;16            (E) Consolidated corporations. In the case of a 17        corporation which is a member of an affiliated group 18        of corporations filing a consolidated income tax 19        return for the taxable year for federal income tax 20        purposes, taxable income determined as if such 21        corporation had filed a separate return for federal 22        income tax purposes for the taxable year and each 23        preceding taxable year for which it was a member of an 24        affiliated group. For purposes of this subparagraph, 25        the taxpayer's separate taxable income shall be 26        determined as if the election provided by Section   SB0219- 103 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        243(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code had been in 2        effect for all such years;3            (F) Cooperatives. In the case of a cooperative 4        corporation or association, the taxable income of such 5        organization determined in accordance with the 6        provisions of Section 1381 through 1388 of the 7        Internal Revenue Code, but without regard to the 8        prohibition against offsetting losses from patronage 9        activities against income from nonpatronage 10        activities; except that a cooperative corporation or 11        association may make an election to follow its federal 12        income tax treatment of patronage losses and 13        nonpatronage losses. In the event such election is 14        made, such losses shall be computed and carried over 15        in a manner consistent with subsection (a) of Section 16        207 of this Act and apportioned by the apportionment 17        factor reported by the cooperative on its Illinois 18        income tax return filed for the taxable year in which 19        the losses are incurred. The election shall be 20        effective for all taxable years with original returns 21        due on or after the date of the election. In addition, 22        the cooperative may file an amended return or returns, 23        as allowed under this Act, to provide that the 24        election shall be effective for losses incurred or 25        carried forward for taxable years occurring prior to 26        the date of the election. Once made, the election may   SB0219- 104 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        only be revoked upon approval of the Director. The 2        Department shall adopt rules setting forth 3        requirements for documenting the elections and any 4        resulting Illinois net loss and the standards to be 5        used by the Director in evaluating requests to revoke 6        elections. Public Act 96-932 is declaratory of 7        existing law; 8            (G) Subchapter S corporations. In the case of: (i) 9        a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 10        effect an election for the taxable year under Section 11        1362 of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable income 12        of such corporation determined in accordance with 13        Section 1363(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, except 14        that taxable income shall take into account those 15        items which are required by Section 1363(b)(1) of the 16        Internal Revenue Code to be separately stated; and 17        (ii) a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 18        effect a federal election to opt out of the provisions 19        of the Subchapter S Revision Act of 1982 and have 20        applied instead the prior federal Subchapter S rules 21        as in effect on July 1, 1982, the taxable income of 22        such corporation determined in accordance with the 23        federal Subchapter S rules as in effect on July 1, 24        1982; and25            (H) Partnerships. In the case of a partnership, 26        taxable income determined in accordance with Section   SB0219- 105 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        703 of the Internal Revenue Code, except that taxable 2        income shall take into account those items which are 3        required by Section 703(a)(1) to be separately stated 4        but which would be taken into account by an individual 5        in calculating his taxable income.6        (3) Recapture of business expenses on disposition of 7    asset or business. Notwithstanding any other law to the 8    contrary, if in prior years income from an asset or 9    business has been classified as business income and in a 10    later year is demonstrated to be non-business income, then 11    all expenses, without limitation, deducted in such later 12    year and in the 2 immediately preceding taxable years 13    related to that asset or business that generated the 14    non-business income shall be added back and recaptured as 15    business income in the year of the disposition of the 16    asset or business. Such amount shall be apportioned to 17    Illinois using the greater of the apportionment fraction 18    computed for the business under Section 304 of this Act 19    for the taxable year or the average of the apportionment 20    fractions computed for the business under Section 304 of 21    this Act for the taxable year and for the 2 immediately 22    preceding taxable years.  23    (f) Valuation limitation amount.24        (1) In general. The valuation limitation amount 25    referred to in subsections (a)(2)(G), (c)(2)(I) and   SB0219- 106 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1    (d)(2)(E) is an amount equal to:2            (A) The sum of the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 3        amounts (to the extent consisting of gain reportable 4        under the provisions of Section 1245 or 1250 of the 5        Internal Revenue Code) for all property in respect of 6        which such gain was reported for the taxable year; 7        plus8            (B) The lesser of (i) the sum of the pre-August 1, 9        1969 appreciation amounts (to the extent consisting of 10        capital gain) for all property in respect of which 11        such gain was reported for federal income tax purposes 12        for the taxable year, or (ii) the net capital gain for 13        the taxable year, reduced in either case by any amount 14        of such gain included in the amount determined under 15        subsection (a)(2)(F) or (c)(2)(H).16        (2) Pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation amount.17            (A) If the fair market value of property referred 18        to in paragraph (1) was readily ascertainable on 19        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 20        amount for such property is the lesser of (i) the 21        excess of such fair market value over the taxpayer's 22        basis (for determining gain) for such property on that 23        date (determined under the Internal Revenue Code as in 24        effect on that date), or (ii) the total gain realized 25        and reportable for federal income tax purposes in 26        respect of the sale, exchange or other disposition of   SB0219- 107 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1        such property.2            (B) If the fair market value of property referred 3        to in paragraph (1) was not readily ascertainable on 4        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 5        amount for such property is that amount which bears 6        the same ratio to the total gain reported in respect of 7        the property for federal income tax purposes for the 8        taxable year, as the number of full calendar months in 9        that part of the taxpayer's holding period for the 10        property ending July 31, 1969 bears to the number of 11        full calendar months in the taxpayer's entire holding 12        period for the property.13            (C) The Department shall prescribe such 14        regulations as may be necessary to carry out the 15        purposes of this paragraph. 16    (g) Double deductions. Unless specifically provided 17otherwise, nothing in this Section shall permit the same item 18to be deducted more than once. 19    (h) Legislative intention. Except as expressly provided by 20this Section there shall be no modifications or limitations on 21the amounts of income, gain, loss or deduction taken into 22account in determining gross income, adjusted gross income or 23taxable income for federal income tax purposes for the taxable 24year, or in the amount of such items entering into the   SB0219- 108 -LRB104 07439 HLH 17480 b1computation of base income and net income under this Act for 2such taxable year, whether in respect of property values as of 3August 1, 1969 or otherwise.4(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 5102-658, eff. 8-27-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1112, eff. 612-21-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-478, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, 7Article 10, Section 10-900, eff. 6-7-24; 103-592, Article 170, 8Section 170-90, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-647, 9eff. 7-1-24; revised 8-20-24.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.